Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1687.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 404 of the act of December 5, 1936 (2nd Sp.Sess., 1937 P.L.2897, No.1), known as the Unemployment Compensation Law, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 404. Rate and Amount of Compensation.--Compensation shall be paid to each eligible employe in accordance with the following provisions of this section except that compensation 123456789101112131415161718192021222324 payable with respect to weeks ending in benefit years which begin prior to the first day of January 1989 shall be paid on the basis of the provisions of this section in effect at the beginning of such benefit years.* * *(c.1) Notwithstanding the maximum number of weeks provided in subsection (c) of this section, for claims with an application for benefits date on or after the effective date of this subsection, the maximum number of weeks that an individual may receive shall be determined under this subsection, as follows:(1) The maximum number of weeks that an individual may receive unemployment benefits shall be based on the seasonal adjusted Statewide unemployment rate that applies to the six-month application period in which the claim is filed, with one six-month application period beginning on January 1 and one six-month application period beginning on July 1. The following apply to the application period and seasonal adjusted unemployment rates:(i) For the application period that begins January 1, the average of the seasonal adjusted unemployment rates for this Commonwealth for the preceding months of July, August and September applies.(ii) For the application period that begins July 1, the average of the seasonal adjusted unemployment rates for this Commonwealth for the preceding months of January, February and March applies.(iii) The department shall use the most recent seasonal adjusted unemployment rates determined by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, and not the 20250HB1687PN2072 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 rate as revised in the annual benchmark.(iv) The maximum number of weeks under this paragraph shall be determined using the following table:Seasonal Adjusted Unemployment Rate Number of WeeksLess than or equal to 5.5% 12Greater than 5.5% and 6% or less 13Greater than 6% and 6.5% or less 14Greater than 6.5% and 7% or less 15Greater than 7% and 7.5% or less 16Greater than 7.5% and 8% or less 17Greater than 8% and 8.5% or less 18Greater than 8.5% and 9% or less 19Greater than 9% 20(2) The total maximum benefits paid to an individual in a single benefit year may not exceed the individual's weekly benefit amount on Part B of the Table Specified for the Determination of Rate and Amount of Benefits multiplied by the number of weeks allowed under paragraph (1) of this subsection.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in six months.20250HB1687PN2072 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021